New Jersey, session 221, A5351.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Certificate of eligibility means an instructional certificate with lifetime validity issued by the State Board of Examiners to candidates who meet degree, academic, and applicable test requirements for teacher certification. Certificate of eligibility with advanced standing means an instructional certificate with lifetime validity issued by the State Board of Examiners to candidates who meet degree, academic, and test requirements for teacher certification and complete an educator preparation program. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the State Board of Education shall establish interstate reciprocity for a certificate of eligibility or a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing for a teacher who holds the equivalent of a valid certificate of eligibility or certificate of eligibility with advanced standing in another state. c.     In order to be eligible for a certificate of eligibility or a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing, as applicable, pursuant to subsection b. of this section, a teacher candidate shall: (1)   hold a valid and current certificate of eligibility or a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing, or the equivalent certificate, issued by another state for which there is an equivalent and currently-issued New Jersey grade level or subject endorsement; (2)   have held employment as a public school teacher in the state in which the teacher holds the certificate of eligibility or certificate of eligibility with advanced standing, or the equivalent certificate, during one of the last two school years; (3)   submit an application to the State Board of Examiners that includes two letters of recommendation, one of which shall be from a current or former supervisor, principal, or employing public schools human resource officer; (4)   pass a criminal history record check in accordance with section 1 of P.L.1986, c.116 (C.18A:6-7.1); (5)   comply with the residency requirements of R.S.52:14-7; and (6)   satisfy any other requirements established by the State Board of Education. 2.    The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.